Maryland, session 2026, SB0500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–323.
(g) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) 1. “Disabled veteran” means an individual who:
A. is honorably discharged or released under honorable
circumstances from [active military, naval, or air service] THE UNIFORMED SERVICES as
defined in [38 U.S.C. § 101] 10 U.S.C. § 101; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0500*

SENATE BILL 500
B. has been declared by the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs to have a permanent service–connected disability that results from blindness or
other disabling cause that:
I. is reasonably certain to continue for the life of the veteran;
and
II. was not caused or incurred by misconduct of the veteran.
2. “Disabled veteran” includes an individual who qualifies
posthumously for a service–connected disability.
(iii) “Dwelling house”:
1. means real property that is:
A. the legal residence of a disabled veteran or a surviving
spouse; and
B. occupied by not more than two families; and
2. includes the lot or curtilage and structures necessary to
use the real property as a residence.
(iv) “Surviving spouse” means an individual who has not remarried
and who is the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran.
(2) The governing body of Washington County may grant, by law, a
property tax credit under this subsection against the county property tax imposed on a
dwelling house if:
(i) the dwelling house is owned by:
1. a disabled veteran; or
2. a surviving spouse of a disabled veteran, if:
A. the dwelling house was owned by the disabled veteran at
the time of the disabled veteran’s death; and
B. the surviving spouse meets the requirements of paragraph
(4) of this subsection; and
(ii) the application requirements of paragraph (5) of this subsection
are met.

SENATE BILL 500 3
(3) The property tax credit granted under this subsection shall equal a
percentage of the amount of property tax imposed on the dwelling house that is equal to
the percentage of the disabled veteran’s service–connected disability rating.
(4) After a disabled veteran dies, the surviving spouse of the disabled
veteran may receive a disabled veteran’s property tax credit for the dwelling house that
was formerly owned by the disabled veteran if:
(i) the dwelling house received a property tax credit under this
subsection; and
(ii) the surviving spouse owns and resides in the dwelling house.
(5) (i) A disabled veteran or a surviving spouse of a disabled veteran
shall apply for the property tax credit under this subsection by providing to the county:
1. a copy of the disabled veteran’s discharge certificate from
active military, naval, or air service; and
2. on the form provided by the county, a certification of the
disabled veteran’s disability from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs.
(ii) The disabled veteran’s certificate of disability may not be
inspected by individuals other than:
1. the disabled veteran; or
2. appropriate employees of the county.
(6) The governing body of Washington County may provide, by law, for:
(i) the duration of the tax credit;
(ii) regulations and procedures for the application and uniform
processing of requests for the tax credit; and
(iii) any other provision necessary to carry out the tax credit under
this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.